Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2711
Single custodianship.

A transfer may be made only for one minor, and only one person may be the custodian. All custodial property held under the Nebraska Uniform Transfers to Minors Act by the same custodian for the benefit of the same minor constitutes a single custodianship.

Laws 1992, LB 907, § 11.